Utah statutes.
59-2-1005.   Procedures for appeal of personal property valuation -- Time
for appeal -- Hearing -- Decision -- Appeal to commission.
(1) For personal property assessed by a county assessor in accordance with
Section 59-2-301, the county legislative body shall include with the signed
statement required by Section 59-2-306 a notice of procedures for an appeal
relating to the value of the personal property.
(2) (a)  If personal property is subject to a fee in lieu of tax or the
uniform tax under Article XIII, Sec. 2, Utah Constitution, and the fee or tax
is based upon the value of the property, the basis of the value may be
appealed to the commission.
(b)  For the personal property described in Subsection (2)(a), a taxpayer may
make an appeal relating to the value of the personal property by filing an
application with the county legislative body no later than 30 days after the
mailing of the tax notice.
(3) (a)  After giving reasonable notice, the county legislative body shall
hear an appeal filed in accordance with Subsection (2) and render a written
decision.
(b)  The written decision described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be rendered no
later than 60 days after receipt of the appeal.
(4)  If any taxpayer is dissatisfied with a decision rendered in accordance
with Subsection (3) by the county legislative body, the taxpayer may file an
appeal with the commission in accordance with Section 59-2-1006.
(5)  For personal property assessed by the commission in accordance with
Section 59-2-201, a taxpayer may make an appeal relating to the personal
property in accordance with Section 59-2-1007.
